Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 6.1.
Custody and Visitation Arrangements for Minor Children.

Research References.

- Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender).
No. 5-120. Answer to Complaint for Divorce Requesting Custody of Children Be Placed with Defendant, et seq.; No. 5-268. Petition for Custody, et seq.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§
53; 14A M.J. Parent and Child,

§

4.

§ 20-124.1. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

"
Joint custody
" means (i) joint legal custody where both parents retain joint responsibility for the care and control of the child and joint authority to make decisions concerning the child even though the child's primary residence may be with only one parent, (ii) joint physical custody where both parents share physical and custodial care of the child, or (iii) any combination of joint legal and joint physical custody which the court deems to be in the best interest of the child.

"
Person with a legitimate interest
" shall be broadly construed and includes, but is not limited to, grandparents, step-grandparents, stepparents, former stepparents, blood relatives and family members provided any such party has intervened in the suit or is otherwise properly before the court. The term shall be broadly construed to accommodate the best interest of the child. A party with a legitimate interest shall not include any person (i) whose parental rights have been terminated by court order, either voluntarily or involuntarily, (ii) whose interest in the child derives from or through a person whose parental rights have been terminated, either voluntarily or involuntarily, including but not limited to grandparents, stepparents, former stepparents, blood relatives and family members, if the child subsequently has been legally adopted, except where a final order of adoption is entered pursuant to § 63.2-1241, or (iii) who has been convicted of a violation of subsection A of § 18.2-61, § 18.2-63, subsection B of § 18.2-366, or an equivalent offense of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction, when the child who is the subject of the petition was conceived as a result of such violation.

"
Sole custody
" means that one person retains responsibility for the care and control of a child and has primary authority to make decisions concerning the child.

(1994, c. 769; 1997, c. 690; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830; 2003, c. 229; 2005, c. 890; 2014, c. 653.)

Cross references.

- As to power of attorney to delegate parental or legal custodial powers, see
§
20-166.

The 1999 amendment

inserted "
§
18.2-63" following "

§

18.2-61" near the end of the paragraph defining "Person with a legitimate interest."

The 2000 amendments.

- The 2000 amendment by c. 830 substituted "
§
63.1-219.48" for "

§

63.1.231" at the end of clause (i) in the third sentence in the paragraph defining "Person with a legitimate interest."

The 2003 amendments.

- The 2003 amendment by c. 229, in the third sentence of the paragraph defining "Person with a legitimate interest," deleted "or any other person" at the end of clause (i), inserted "(ii)," in clause (ii), substituted "a person" for "such person" and "terminated, either voluntarily or involuntarily" for "so terminated," and substituted "(iii)" for "(ii)."

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 890 inserted "or an equivalent offense of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction" in the last sentence of the definition of "Person with a legitimate interest"; made a related change; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendments.

- The 2014 amendment by c. 653 in the definition of "Person with a legitimate interest" inserted "step-grandparents" in the first sentence and made a minor stylistic change.

Law review.

- For 1994 survey of Virginia domestic relations law, see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 981 (1994).

For an article, "Domestic Relations," see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1069 (1997).

For 2006 survey article, "Family and Juvenile Law," see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For 2007 annual survey article, "Family and Juvenile Law," see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 417 (2007).

Research References.

- Child Custody and Visitation Law and Practice (Matthew Bender).

§ 20-124.2. Court-ordered custody and visitation arrangements.

In any case in which custody or visitation of minor children is at issue, whether in a circuit or district court, the court shall provide prompt adjudication, upon due consideration of all the facts, of custody and visitation arrangements, including support and maintenance for the children, prior to other considerations arising in the matter. The court may enter an order pending the suit as provided in § 20-103. The procedures for determining custody and visitation arrangements shall insofar as practical, and consistent with the ends of justice, preserve the dignity and resources of family members. Mediation shall be used as an alternative to litigation where appropriate. When mediation is used in custody and visitation matters, the goals may include development of a proposal addressing the child's residential schedule and care arrangements, and how disputes between the parents will be handled in the future.

In determining custody, the court shall give primary consideration to the best interests of the child. The court shall consider and may award joint legal, joint physical, or sole custody, and there shall be no presumption in favor of any form of custody. The court shall assure minor children of frequent and continuing contact with both parents, when appropriate, and encourage parents to share in the responsibilities of rearing their children. As between the parents, there shall be no presumption or inference of law in favor of either. The court shall give due regard to the primacy of the parent-child relationship but may upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence that the best interest of the child would be served thereby award custody or visitation to any other person with a legitimate interest.

The court may order that support be paid for any child of the parties. Upon request of either party, the court may order that such support payments be made to a special needs trust or an ABLE savings trust account as defined in § 23.1-700. The court shall also order that support will continue to be paid for any child over the age of 18 who is (i) a full-time high school student, (ii) not self-supporting, and (iii) living in the home of the party seeking or receiving child support until such child reaches the age of 19 or graduates from high school, whichever first occurs. The court may also order that support be paid or continue to be paid for any child over the age of 18 who is (a) severely and permanently mentally or physically disabled, and such disability existed prior to the child reaching the age of 18 or the age of 19 if the child met the requirements of clauses (i), (ii), and (iii); (b) unable to live independently and support himself; and (c) residing in the home of the parent seeking or receiving child support. In addition, the court may confirm a stipulation or agreement of the parties which extends a support obligation beyond when it would otherwise terminate as provided by law. The court shall have no authority to decree support of children payable by the estate of a deceased party. The court may make such further decree as it shall deem expedient concerning support of the minor children, including an order that either party or both parties provide health care coverage or cash medical support, or both.

In any case in which custody or visitation of minor children is at issue, whether in a circuit or district court, the court may order an independent mental health or psychological evaluation to assist the court in its determination of the best interests of the child. The court may enter such order as it deems appropriate for the payment of the costs of the evaluation by the parties.

The court shall have the continuing authority and jurisdiction to make any additional orders necessary to effectuate and enforce any order entered pursuant to this section or § 20-103 including the authority to punish as contempt of court any willful failure of a party to comply with the provisions of the order. A parent or other person having legal custody of a child may petition the court to enjoin and the court may enter an order to enjoin a parent of the child from filing a petition relating to custody and visitation of that child for any period of time up to 10 years if doing so is in the best interests of the child and such parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction which constitutes (i) murder or voluntary manslaughter, or a felony attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit any such offense, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent, a child with whom the parent resided at the time the offense occurred, or the other parent of the child, or (ii) felony assault resulting in serious bodily injury, felony bodily wounding resulting in serious bodily injury, or felony sexual assault, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent or a child with whom the parent resided at the time of the offense. When such a petition to enjoin the filing of a petition for custody and visitation is filed, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child pursuant to § 16.1-266.

In any custody or visitation case or proceeding wherein an order prohibiting a party from picking the child up from school is entered pursuant to this section or § 20-103, the court shall order a party to such case or proceeding to provide a copy of such custody or visitation order to the school at which the child is enrolled within three business days of such party's receipt of such custody or visitation order.

B1.
In any case or proceeding involving the custody or visitation of a child, as to a parent, the court may, in its discretion, use the phrase "parenting time" to be synonymous with the term "visitation."

B2.
In any case or proceeding in which a grandparent has petitioned the court for visitation with a minor grandchild, and a natural or adoptive parent of the minor grandchild is deceased or incapacitated, the grandparent who is related to such deceased or incapacitated parent shall be permitted to introduce evidence of such parent's consent to visitation with the grandparent, in accordance with the rules of evidence. If the parent's consent is proven by a preponderance of the evidence, the court may then determine if grandparent visitation is in the best interest of the minor grandchild. For the purposes of this subsection, "incapacitated parent" has the same meaning ascribed to the term "incapacitated person" in § 64.2-2000.

If a custody determination affects the school enrollment of the child subject to such custody order and prohibits a party from picking the child up from school, the court shall order a party to provide a copy of such custody order to the school at which the child will be enrolled within three business days of such party's receipt of such order. Such order directing a party to provide a copy of such custody or visitation order shall further require such party, upon any subsequent change in the child's school enrollment, to provide a copy of such custody or visitation order to the new school at which the child is subsequently enrolled within three business days of such enrollment.

If the court determines that a party is unable to deliver the custody or visitation order to the school, such party shall provide the court with the name of the principal and address of the school, and the court shall cause the order to be mailed by first class mail to such school principal.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any school staff to interpret or enforce the terms of such custody or visitation order.

(1994, c. 769; 1996, cc. 767, 879, 884; 1999, c. 574; 2003, c. 520; 2006, c. 665; 2009, c. 713; 2015, cc. 653, 654; 2017, cc. 46, 95, 509; 2018, c. 857; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 253.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2015, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 2 provides: "That an individual denied support under
§
16.1-278.15, 20-60.3, or 20-124.2 prior to July 1, 2015, who otherwise meets the requirements for support under this act, shall be eligible to petition the court for support under the provisions of this act. In such cases, liability shall be determined according to subsection B of

§

20-108.1, and the date of the new petition shall be the date that the proceeding was commenced for purposes of subsection B of

§

20-108.1."

The 1999 amendment

added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2003 amendments.

- The 2003 amendment by c. 520, in subsection C, substituted "18" for "eighteen" and "19" for "nineteen"; inserted subsection D; and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E.

The 2006 amendments.

- The 2006 amendment by c. 665 added the second and last sentences in subsection E.

The 2009 amendments.

- The 2009 amendment by c. 713, in subsection C, in the last sentence, substituted "either party or both parties" for "any party" and added "or cash medical support, or both" to the end.

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendments by cc. 653 and 654 are identical, and in subsection C, substituted "that support be paid or continue to be paid" for "the continuation of support," redesignated clauses (i) through (iii) as clauses (a) through (c), inserted "and such disability existed prior to the child reaching the age of 18 or the age of 19 if the child met the requirements of clauses (i), (ii), and (iii)" and substituted "residing" for "resides."

The 2017 amendments.

- The 2017 amendment by c. 46 inserted subsection B1.

The 2017 amendment by c. 95 inserted the second sentence in subsection C.

The 2017 amendment by c. 509 added subsection F.

The 2018 amendments.

- The 2018 amendment by c. 857, in subsection B, inserted the second sentence and deleted the last sentence which read "The court may award joint custody or sole custody."

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

- The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 253, effective July 1, 2021, inserted subsection B2.

Law review.

- For a review of domestic relations law in Virginia for year 1999, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (1999).

For article, "Family Law," see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 651 (2001).

For article surveying developments in family law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (2002).

For case note & comment, "A Privilege for 'Mommy Dearest'? Criticizing Virginia's Mental Health Records Privilege in Custody Disputes and the Court's Application in Schwartz v. Schwartz," see 13 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 1341 (2006).

For 2006 survey article, "Family and Juvenile Law," see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

§ 20-124.2:1. In camera interviews of child; record.

In any proceeding in a court of record to determine custody or visitation, when the court conducts an in camera interview of a minor child whose custody or visitation is at issue without the presence of the parties or their counsel, a record of the interview shall be prepared, unless the parties otherwise agree. The record of the interview shall be made a part of the record in the case unless a decision is made by the court that doing so would endanger the safety of the child. The cost of creating the record shall be taxed as costs to the parties to the proceeding.

(2003, c. 1024.)

§ 20-124.3. Best interests of the child; visitation.

In determining best interests of a child for purposes of determining custody or visitation arrangements, including any pendente lite orders pursuant to § 20-103, the court shall consider the following:

The age and physical and mental condition of the child, giving due consideration to the child's changing developmental needs;

The age and physical and mental condition of each parent;

The relationship existing between each parent and each child, giving due consideration to the positive involvement with the child's life, the ability to accurately assess and meet the emotional, intellectual, and physical needs of the child;

The needs of the child, giving due consideration to other important relationships of the child, including but not limited to siblings, peers, and extended family members;

The role that each parent has played and will play in the future, in the upbringing and care of the child;

The propensity of each parent to actively support the child's contact and relationship with the other parent, including whether a parent has unreasonably denied the other parent access to or visitation with the child;

The relative willingness and demonstrated ability of each parent to maintain a close and continuing relationship with the child, and the ability of each parent to cooperate in and resolve disputes regarding matters affecting the child;

The reasonable preference of the child, if the court deems the child to be of reasonable intelligence, understanding, age, and experience to express such a preference;

Any history of (i) family abuse as that term is defined in § 16.1-228; (ii) sexual abuse; (iii) child abuse; or (iv) an act of violence, force, or threat as defined in § 19.2-152.7:1 that occurred no earlier than 10 years prior to the date a petition is filed. If the court finds such a history or act, the court may disregard the factors in subdivision 6; and

Such other factors as the court deems necessary and proper to the determination.

The judge shall communicate to the parties the basis of the decision either orally or in writing. Except in cases of consent orders for custody and visitation, this communication shall set forth the judge's findings regarding the relevant factors set forth in this section. At the request of either party, the court may order that the exchange of a child shall take place at an appropriate meeting place.

(1994, c. 769; 1999, c. 634; 2000, c. 466; 2004, c. 221; 2009, c. 684; 2012, c. 358; 2019, c. 378; 2020, cc. 1074, 1075.)

The 1999 amendment

inserted "and resolve disputes regarding" in subdivision 6 and inserted the concluding paragraph.

The 2000 amendments.

- The 2000 amendment by c. 466 divided former subdivision 6 into present subdivisions 6 and 7; in present subdivision 6, added "including whether a parent has unreasonably denied the other parent access to or visitation with the child"; and redesignated former subdivisions 7 through 9 as present subdivisions 8 through 10.

The 2004 amendments.

- The 2004 amendment by c. 221 added the last sentence in subdivision 9; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments.

- The 2009 amendment by c. 684 inserted "or sexual abuse" in subdivision 9.

The 2012 amendments.

- The 2012 amendment by c. 358 added the second sentence of the last paragraph.

The 2019 amendments.

- The 2019 amendment by c. 378 added the third sentence in the last paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendments by cc. 1074 and 1075 are identical, and in subdivision 9, added clauses (ii) through (iv), inserted "or act" in the last sentence, and made stylistic changes.

Law review.

- For article, "Family Law," see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 651 (2001).

For article surveying developments in family law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (2002).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For case note & comment, "A Privilege for 'Mommy Dearest'? Criticizing Virginia's Mental Health Records Privilege in Custody Disputes and the Court's Application in Schwartz v. Schwartz," see 13 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 1341 (2006).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

§ 20-124.3:1.

Repealed by Acts 2008, c. 809, cl. 1.

§ 20-124.4. Mediation.

In any appropriate case the court shall refer the parents or persons with a legitimate interest to a dispute resolution orientation session to be conducted by a mediator certified pursuant to guidelines promulgated by the Judicial Council at no cost and in accordance with the procedures set out in Chapter 20.2 (§ 8.01-576.4 et seq.) of Title 8.01. In assessing the appropriateness of a referral, the court shall ascertain upon motion of a party whether there is a history of family abuse. If an agreement is not reached on any issue through further mediation as agreed to by the parties, prior to the return date set by the court pursuant to § 8.01-576.5, the court shall proceed with a hearing on any unresolved issue, unless a continuance has been granted by the court.

The fee of the mediator shall be $100 per appointment mediated and shall be paid by the Commonwealth from the funds appropriated for payment of appointments made pursuant to subsection B of § 16.1-267. Any referral that includes both (i) custody or visitation and (ii) child or spousal support shall be considered two separate appointments.

(1994, c. 769; 2000, c. 768; 2016, c. 507.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 43 F, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: "Notwithstanding the provisions of
§
20-124.4, Code of Virginia, the fee paid to mediators shall be $120 per appointment mediated. For such purpose, $303,000 the first year and $303,000 the second year from the general fund is included in the appropriation for this item."

The 2000 amendments.

- The 2000 amendment by c. 768 inserted "by a mediator certified pursuant to guidelines promulgated by the Judicial Council" and deleted "to the parties" following "at no cost" in the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

- The 2016 amendment by c. 507, added subsection A designation; in subsection A, substituted "orientation" for "evaluation"; and deleted "The fee of a mediator appointed in any custody, support or visitation case shall be $100 per appointment and shall be paid by the Commonwealth from the funds appropriated for payment of appointments made pursuant to subsection B of
§
16.1-267"; and added subsection B.

Research References.

- Research references. Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender).
No. 2-1011 Order Referring Case for Dispute Resolution Proceeding, et seq.

§ 20-124.5. Notification of relocation.

In any proceeding involving custody or visitation, the court shall include as a condition of any custody or visitation order a requirement that thirty days' advance written notice be given to the court and the other party by any party intending to relocate and of any intended change of address, unless the court, for good cause shown, orders otherwise. The court may require that the notice be in such form and contain such information as it deems proper and necessary under the circumstances of the case.

(1994, c. 769.)

Law review.

- For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (2011).

§ 20-124.6. Access to minor's records.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, neither parent, regardless of whether such parent has custody, shall be denied access to the academic or health records or records of a child day center or family day home of that parent's minor child unless otherwise ordered by the court for good cause shown or pursuant to subsection B.

In the case of health records, access may also be denied if the minor's treating physician, clinical psychologist, or clinical social worker has made a part of the minor's record a written statement that, in the exercise of his professional judgment, the furnishing to or review by the requesting parent of such health records would be reasonably likely to cause substantial harm to the minor or another person. If a health care entity denies a parental request for access to, or copies of, a minor's health record, the health care entity denying the request shall comply with the provisions of subsection F of § 32.1-127.1:03. The minor or his parent, either or both, shall have the right to have the denial reviewed as specified in subsection F of § 32.1-127.1:03 to determine whether to make the minor's health record available to the requesting parent.

For the purposes of this section, the terms "health record" or the plural thereof and "health care entity" mean the same as those terms are defined in subsection B of § 32.1-127.1:03. The terms "child day center" and "family day home" mean the same as those terms are defined in § 63.2-100.

(1994, c. 769; 2000, c. 485; 2005, cc. 181, 227; 2020, cc. 178, 945.)

Cross references.

- As to exclusions for certain health records under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see
§
2.2-3705.5.

The 2000 amendments.

- The 2000 amendment by c. 485 inserted "regardless of whether such parent has custody."

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendments by cc. 181 and 227 are identical, and inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph, substituted "academic or health records" for "academic, medical, hospital or other health records" and added "or pursuant to subsection B" in subsection A and added subsections B and C.

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 178, in subsection A, inserted "or records of a child day center or family day home" following "academic or health records"; and in subsection C, substituted "the terms 'health record' or the plural thereof and 'health care entity' mean the same as those terms are defined" for "the meaning of the term 'health record' or the plural thereof and the term 'health care entity' shall be defined" in the first sentence and added the final sentence.

The 2020 amendment by c. 945, in subsection B, substituted "clinical psychologist, or clinical social worker" for "or the minor's treating, clinical psychologist."

Law review.

- For case note & comment, "A Privilege for 'Mommy Dearest'? Criticizing Virginia's Mental Health Records Privilege in Custody Disputes and the Court's Application in Schwartz v. Schwartz," see 13 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 1341 (2006).